New York, session 2025-2026, S9456.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 3 and 4 and paragraph a of subdivision 9 of 2 section 401 of the vehicle and traffic law, subdivision 3 as amended by 3 chapter 548 of the laws of 1986, paragraph a of subdivision 3 as amended 4 by section 1 of part H and paragraph b of subdivision 3 as amended by 5 section 24 of part G of chapter 59 of the laws of 2009, paragraph d of 6 subdivision 3 as added by chapter 152 of the laws of 1990, and subdivi- 7 sion 4 as amended by chapter 132 of the laws of 1986, are amended to 8 read as follows: 9 3. Certificates of registration. a. Upon filing of such application 10 and the payment of the fee hereinafter provided, the commissioner shall 11 assign to such motor vehicle a distinctive number and, without expense 12 to the applicant, issue and deliver in such manner as the commissioner 13 may select to the owner a certificate of registration, in such form as 14 the commissioner shall prescribe, and two number plates at a place with- 15 in the state of New York named by the applicant in [his or her] their 16 application. A number plate, within the meaning of this chapter, may, in 17 the discretion of the commissioner, be a plate of a permanent nature, 18 treated with reflectorized material according to specifications 19 prescribed by the commissioner[, and with a date tag attached to such 20 plate or to the vehicle as prescribed by regulations of the commissioner 21 indicating the validity of the plate during a certain period and the 22 issuance of such a number plate with such date tag to a person possess- 23 ing such a number plate shall be deemed the issuance of a number plate]. 24 An additional fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars, shall be paid to 25 the commissioner whenever a set of reflectorized number plates is issued 26 for any vehicle for which a registration fee is normally charged except EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14856-02-6 S. 9456 2 1 that, with respect to any number plate which is specifically requested 2 by the applicant, such fee shall be paid to the commissioner upon 3 approval of such request. In the event of the loss, mutilation or 4 destruction of any certificate of registration, any number plate or set 5 of number plates [whether with or without a date tag or tags, or any 6 date tag or set of date tags provided for in this article], the owner of 7 a registered motor vehicle may file such statement and proof of the 8 facts as the commissioner shall require, with a fee of three dollars, in 9 the office of the commissioner, or, unless and until the commissioner 10 shall otherwise direct, in the office of the agent who issued the 11 certificate, plate, or plates[, tag or tags] and the commissioner or 12 [his or her] their agent, as the case may be, shall issue a duplicate or 13 substitute. It shall be the duty of every owner holding a certificate of 14 registration to notify the commissioner in writing of any change of 15 residence of such person within ten days after such change occurs, and 16 to inscribe on such certificate, in the place provided by the commis- 17 sioner, a record of such change of residence. 18 b. During a registration period the commissioner may, upon application 19 by the owner of a registered motor vehicle and upon payment of a fee of 20 three dollars and seventy-five cents, change the distinctive number 21 assigned to such motor vehicle and issue a new set of number plates 22 provided the original registration and number plates are surrendered. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this section, the differ- 24 ence collected between the fees set forth in this subdivision in effect 25 on and after September first, two thousand nine and the fees set forth 26 in this subdivision in effect prior to such date shall be deposited to 27 the credit of the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund. 28 c. The commissioner may waive the payment of fees required by para- 29 graph a of this subdivision if the applicant is a victim of crime and 30 the certificate of registration or number plates applied for are a 31 replacement for those that were lost or destroyed as a result of the 32 crime. 33 d. In processing any application for a certificate of registration 34 pursuant to this article or to title eleven of this chapter, the commis- 35 sioner shall provide the applicant with informational materials describ- 36 ing the lead-acid battery management, return and collection requirements 37 set forth in title seventeen of article twenty-seven of the environ- 38 mental conservation law, and the used oil management, recycling and 39 disposal requirements set forth in title twenty-three of article twen- 40 ty-three of the environmental conservation law. Such informational mate- 41 rials shall be distributed at the first opportunity and periodically 42 thereafter. 43 e. The certificate of registration or registration renewal stub may be 44 provided by the commissioner in either paper or electronic form. A 45 certificate of registration or registration renewal stub issued elec- 46 tronically shall be sufficient for any requirements under the law for 47 carrying or producing such documents. For the purposes of this section, 48 "electronic form" means the display of images on an electronic device, 49 such as a cellular telephone, tablet, or computer. The use of a cellular 50 telephone, tablet, computer, or any other electronic device to display 51 any proof of registration issued by the commissioner shall not consti- 52 tute consent for a police officer or judge to access any other contents 53 on the device. Any police officer or judge presented with an electronic 54 device pursuant to this section shall be immune from any liability 55 resulting from unintentional damage to such device. S. 9456 3 1 f. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning 2 the issuance, design, and content of the certificates of registration or 3 registration renewal stubs issued under this section. The commissioner 4 shall take any actions necessary to deter and detect counterfeit or 5 fraudulent certificates of registration or registration renewal stubs in 6 an electronic form. 7 4. Carrying certificate of registration. Any magistrate, motor vehicle 8 inspector, peace officer, acting pursuant to [his] their special duties, 9 or police officer may request that the operator of any motor vehicle 10 produce for inspection the certificate of registration for such vehicle 11 and such operator shall furnish to such magistrate, inspector, peace 12 officer or police officer any information necessary for the identifica- 13 tion of such vehicle and its owner, and all information required 14 concerning [his] their license to operate, if [he is] they are required 15 by law to have such a license, and shall, if required, sign [his] their 16 name in the presence of such magistrate, inspector, peace officer or 17 police officer as a further means of identification. The production of a 18 license to a magistrate, inspector, peace officer or police officer 19 shall be prima facie evidence in a prosecution for a violation of any 20 provision of this chapter, other than section three hundred ninety-two 21 of this chapter, that the person who so produced the license is the 22 person identified on such license. Provided, however, that a photostatic 23 copy of the certificate of registration may be produced in lieu of the 24 original certificate. [If a vehicle does not have affixed a validating 25 sticker which indicates the plate number, the vehicle identification 26 number and the expiration date of the registration, the] No vehicle 27 which was registered under this article shall be required to have a 28 validating sticker affixed to it in any manner. The failure to produce 29 the certificate of registration, or a photostatic copy of such certif- 30 icate, shall be presumptive evidence of operating a motor vehicle or 31 trailer which is not registered as required by this article. 32 a. Where a motor vehicle registered under this article requires regis- 33 tration in another class because of a change in its form or use, an 34 application for the correct registration may be granted upon the surren- 35 dering of the [certificate of registration and] number plates and the 36 payment of a fee of one dollar, together with the excess, if any, of the 37 fee for the correct registration over the fee for the registration in 38 the class in which the vehicle is registered, both fees to be computed 39 as of the date of granting the correct registration; provided, however, 40 that if the vehicle has already been registered in more than one class 41 during the year, the class requiring the highest fee shall be taken as 42 the basis in determining the additional fee, if any, to be paid instead 43 of the class in which the vehicle is registered at the time of the 44 application. 45 § 2. Section 404-a of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 46 a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 47 8. Form of certificate of registration. The certificate of registra- 48 tion or registration renewal stub may be provided by the commissioner in 49 either paper or electronic form. A certificate of registration or regis- 50 tration renewal stub issued electronically shall be sufficient for any 51 requirements under the law for carrying or producing such documents. 52 For the purposes of this section, "electronic form" means the display of 53 images on an electronic device, such as a cellular telephone, tablet, or 54 computer. The use of a cellular telephone, tablet, computer, or any 55 other electronic device to display any proof of registration issued by 56 the commissioner shall not constitute consent for a police officer or S. 9456 4 1 judge to access any other contents on the device. Any police officer or 2 judge presented with an electronic device pursuant to this section shall 3 be immune from any liability resulting from unintentional damage to such 4 device. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations concern- 5 ing the issuance, design, and content of the certificates of registra- 6 tion or registration renewal stubs issued under this section. The 7 commissioner shall take any actions necessary to deter and detect coun- 8 terfeit or fraudulent certificates of registration or registration 9 renewal stubs in an electronic form. 10 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 410 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 11 amended by chapter 466 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 3. Certificate of registration. a. Upon the filing of such application 14 and the payment of the fee hereinafter provided, the commissioner shall 15 assign to such motorcycle a distinctive number and, without expense to 16 the applicant, issue and deliver in such manner as the commissioner may 17 select to the owner a certificate of registration, in such form as the 18 commissioner may prescribe, and a number plate at a place within the 19 state of New York named by the applicant in [his] their application. In 20 the event of the loss, mutilation or destruction of any certificate of 21 registration or number plate, the owner of a registered vehicle may file 22 such statement and proof of the facts as the commissioner shall require, 23 with a fee of three dollars, in the office of the commissioner, or, 24 unless and until the commissioner shall otherwise direct, in the office 25 of the agent who issued the certificate or plate and the commissioner or 26 [his] their agent, as the case may be, shall issue a duplicate or 27 substitute. No application for registration shall be accepted unless the 28 applicant is at least sixteen years of age. 29 b. Upon the issuance of a certificate of registration, the commission- 30 er shall provide the owner of such vehicle with a notice regarding the 31 laws governing unidentifiable motorcycle parts, in such form and manner 32 as the commissioner may prescribe. 33 c. The certificate of registration or registration renewal stub may be 34 provided by the commissioner in either paper or electronic form. A 35 certificate of registration or registration renewal stub issued elec- 36 tronically shall be sufficient for any requirements under the law for 37 carrying or producing such documents. For the purposes of this section, 38 "electronic form" means the display of images on an electronic device, 39 such as a cellular telephone, tablet, or computer. The use of a cellular 40 telephone, tablet, computer, or any other electronic device to display 41 any proof of registration issued by the commissioner shall not consti- 42 tute consent for a police officer or judge to access any other contents 43 on the device. Any police officer or judge presented with an electronic 44 device pursuant to this section shall be immune from any liability 45 resulting from unintentional damage to such device. 46 d. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning 47 the issuance, design, and content of the certificates of registration or 48 registration renewal stubs issued under this section. The commissioner 49 shall take any actions necessary to deter and detect counterfeit or 50 fraudulent certificates of registration or registration renewal stubs in 51 an electronic form. 52 § 4. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 1.20 of the criminal 53 procedure law, as added by chapter 450 of the laws of 2019, is amended 54 to read as follows: 55 (b) an appearance ticket issued for a parking infraction when (i) such 56 ticket is based on personal knowledge or information and belief of the S. 9456 5 1 police officer or other public servant who issues the ticket, (ii) the 2 police officer or other public servant who issues such ticket verifies 3 that false statements made therein are punishable as a class A misdemea- 4 nor, (iii) the infraction or infractions contained therein are stated in 5 detail and not in conclusory terms so as to provide the defendant with 6 sufficient notice including, but not limited, to the applicable 7 provision of law allegedly violated, and the date, time and particular 8 place of the alleged infraction, and (iv) such ticket contains: (1) the 9 license plate designation of the ticketed vehicle, (2) the license plate 10 type of the ticketed vehicle, (3) the expiration of the ticketed vehi- 11 cle's registration, (4) the make or model of the ticketed vehicle, and 12 (5) the body type of the ticketed vehicle, provided, however, that where 13 the plate type or the expiration date are not shown on [either] the 14 registration plates [or sticker] of a vehicle [or where the registration 15 sticker is covered, faded, defaced or mutilated so that it is unread- 16 able], the plate type or the expiration date may be omitted, provided, 17 further, however, that such condition must be so described and inserted 18 on the instrument. 19 § 5. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2-a of section 238 of the vehicle 20 and traffic law, as added by chapter 224 of the laws of 1995, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 (a) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of subdivision two of 23 this section, where the plate type or the expiration date are not shown 24 on [either] the registration plates [or sticker] of a vehicle [or where 25 the registration sticker is covered, faded, defaced or mutilated so that 26 it is unreadable], the plate type or the expiration date may be omitted 27 from the notice of violation; provided, however, such condition must be 28 so described and inserted on the notice of violation. 29 § 6. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (e) of subdivision 4 of section 313 30 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 509 of the laws of 31 1998, is amended to read as follows: 32 (1) Either simultaneously or after the up-dated database system has 33 been established, the commissioner shall develop a computer indicator 34 that can be imprinted [on a vehicle registration sticker or] on a stick- 35 er to be affixed to the insured's license plate. Such indicator system 36 shall enable law enforcement personnel and other authorized persons when 37 acting in the course of their official duties to access the department's 38 database so that such persons can ascertain whether a vehicle is proper- 39 ly insured or not insured; 40 § 7. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (d) of subdivision 4 of section 313 41 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 500 of the laws of 42 2025, is amended to read as follows: 43 (1) Either simultaneously or after the online verification system has 44 been established, the commissioner shall develop a computer indicator 45 that can be imprinted [on a vehicle registration sticker or] on a stick- 46 er to be affixed to the insured's license plate. Such indicator system 47 shall enable law enforcement personnel and other authorized persons when 48 acting in the course of their official duties to access information in 49 the department's online verification system so that such persons can 50 ascertain whether a vehicle is properly insured or not insured; 51 § 8. Section 403-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chap- 52 ter 61 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as follows: 53 § 403-a. Temporary indicia of registration. The commissioner may 54 promulgate regulations to provide for temporary indicia of registration 55 which shall permit a person to operate or park a motor vehicle or trail- 56 er on the public highways of this state without number plates issued by S. 9456 6 1 the commissioner [or validating stickers] for a period not to exceed 2 fifteen days when the number plate or plates [or validating sticker] for 3 such motor vehicle or trailer has been lost, stolen, mutilated or 4 destroyed. Such regulations may provide for the charging of a fee of not 5 more than three dollars for any issuance of temporary indicia of regis- 6 tration. Any person who operates or parks a motor vehicle or trailer on 7 the public highways of this state, which motor vehicle or trailer is in 8 fact validly registered pursuant to the provisions of section four 9 hundred one or four hundred ten of this chapter, without a number plate 10 or plates [or validating sticker], and who has complied with any such 11 regulations promulgated by the commissioner under this section shall not 12 be deemed to be operating or parking a motor vehicle or trailer in 13 violation of subdivision one or three of section four hundred two or 14 section four hundred three of this chapter. Falsifying any temporary 15 indicia of registration prescribed by any regulation of the commissioner 16 issued pursuant to this section shall be a traffic infraction. 17 § 9. Subdivision 1 of section 428 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 18 amended by chapter 515 of the laws of 1982, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 1. Any fee paid for the registration of a vehicle under the provisions 21 of this chapter shall be refunded, less the sum of one dollar, provided 22 that the commissioner and the state comptroller are satisfied that the 23 registration has not been used and the number plates [and sticker] have 24 been surrendered to the commissioner within two months after the date 25 the fee was paid or the beginning of the registration period for which 26 the registration was issued, whichever comes later and application 27 therefor is filed with the commissioner within the period of validity 28 for which such registration was issued. 29 § 10. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 450.10 of the penal 30 law, as added by chapter 421 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 (c) A motor vehicle alleged to have been stolen but not alleged to 33 have been used in connection with any crime or criminal transaction 34 other than the theft or unlawful use of said motor vehicle, which is in 35 the custody of a police officer, a peace officer or a district attorney, 36 may be released expeditiously to its registered owner or the owner's 37 representative without prior notice to the defendant. Before such 38 release, evidentiary photographs shall be taken of such motor vehicle. 39 Such photographs shall include the vehicle identification number, 40 [registration on windshield,] license plates, each side of the vehicle, 41 including vent windows, door locks and handles, the front and back of 42 the vehicle, the interior of the vehicle, including ignition lock, seat 43 to floor clearance, center console, radio receptacle and dashboard area, 44 the motor, and any other interior or exterior surfaces showing any and 45 all damage to the vehicle. Notice of such release, and the photographs 46 taken of said vehicle, shall be furnished to the defendant within 47 fifteen days after arraignment or after counsel initially appears on 48 behalf of the defendant or respondent, whichever occurs later. 49 § 11. Subparagraph 3 of paragraph a of subdivision 5 of section 236 of 50 the vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 388 of the laws of 51 1993, is amended to read as follows: 52 (3) such owner or other person presents either a physical or electron- 53 ic registration card or title for the vehicle, and 54 § 12. Subdivision 1 of section 312 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 55 separately amended by chapters 781 and 896 of the laws of 1983 and as S. 9456 7 1 further amended by section 104 of part A of chapter 62 of the laws of 2 2011, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. (a) No motor vehicle shall be registered in this state unless the 4 application for such registration is accompanied by proof of financial 5 security which shall be evidenced by proof of insurance or evidence of a 6 financial security bond, a financial security deposit or qualification 7 as a self-insurer under section three hundred sixteen; provided that, if 8 directed by regulation of the commissioner, upon renewal of registration 9 an application [accompanied by a certificate of registration or renewal 10 stub] in force immediately preceding the date of application for 11 renewal, together with a statement in a form prescribed by the commis- 12 sioner certifying that there is in effect proof of financial security, 13 shall meet the requirements of this section. Upon the issuance or 14 renewal of a private passenger automobile insurance policy subject to 15 the provisions [of section one hundred sixty-seven-aa] of the insurance 16 law, the insurance company shall provide the insured with an informa- 17 tional statement outlining the legal and financial consequences of 18 convictions under section one thousand one hundred ninety-two of this 19 chapter, pertaining to operating a motor vehicle while under the influ- 20 ence of alcohol or drugs. Such information shall be supplied to the 21 company by the state department of financial services in consultation 22 with the commissioner. 23 (b) The owner of such motor vehicle shall maintain proof of financial 24 security continuously throughout the registration period and [his] such 25 owner's failure to produce proof of financial security when requested to 26 do so upon demand of a magistrate, motor vehicle inspector, peace offi- 27 cer, acting pursuant to [his] their special duties, or police officer, 28 while such vehicle is being operated upon the public highway, shall be 29 presumptive evidence of operating a motor vehicle without proof of 30 financial security. Upon the production of proof of financial security 31 such presumption is removed. Production of proof of financial security 32 may be made by mailing such proof to the court having jurisdiction in 33 the matter, and any necessary response by such court or acknowledgement 34 of the production of such proof may also be made by mail. When insurance 35 with respect to any motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, is termi- 36 nated the owner shall surrender forthwith [his registration certificate 37 and] the number plates of the vehicle to the commissioner unless proof 38 of financial security otherwise is maintained in compliance with this 39 article. 40 § 13. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 41 law; provided, however, section seven of this act shall take effect on 42 the same date and in the same manner as section 2 of chapter 500 of the 43 laws of 2025, takes effect. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 44 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 45 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 46 completed on or before such effective date.